Hawaii, session 2026, SB2068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) There is established the affordable housing land inventory task force to be placed in the office of planning and sustainable development for administrative purposes. (b)  The task force shall consist of the following members or their designees: (1)  The director of the office of planning and sustainable development, who shall serve as the chairperson; (2)  The executive director of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation; (3)  The executive director of the Hawaii public housing authority; (4)  The executive director of the Hawaii community development authority; (5)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources; and (6)  The mayor of each county. Task force members may recommend and invite to the task force additional members having appropriate special expertise, including representatives from organizations with experience in real estate development or redevelopment, for approval by the chairperson. (c)  The task force shall: (1)  Subject to legislative appropriation, conduct a study in collaboration with public landowners and the counties on how to maximize housing development in transit-oriented development zones, near transit hubs, bus stations, or urban growth areas on state or county lands. In conducting the study, the task force may consider the following: (A)  Agencies' planned or intended use of the properties; (B)  Existing uses, facilities, and conditions; (C)  Site constraints, environmental conditions, and entitlements required; (D)  Constraints to development readiness, such as tenancy agreements and funding; and (E)  Estimates of potential housing units and housing types that could be accommodated on the sites; and (2)  Submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, and a list of parcels to be redeveloped, the number of units to be developed on each parcel, and the dates by which the parcels will be redeveloped to meet Hawaii's housing needs over the next one hundred years, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028. (d)  The members of the task force shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (e)  The office of planning and sustainable development shall provide administrative and clerical support required by the task force. (f)  The task force shall be dissolved on January 1, 2028. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish and fund a staff position and for contractual services incurred by the task force established pursuant to section 1 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of planning and sustainable development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.